Hawaii statutes.
§48E-3 Compliance with state and local law.
The financing of any pollution control project under this chapter shall not
relieve any project party or other user of such project from compliance with
all laws, ordinances, and rules and regulations of the State and county or any
departments or boards thereof with respect to the construction, operation, and
maintenance of pollution control projects, compliance with master plans or
zoning laws or regulations, obtaining of building permits, compliance with building
and health codes and other laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations of
similar nature pertaining to the project, and such laws shall be applicable to
such project party or such other user to the same extent they would be if the
costs of the pollution control project were directly financed by the project
party. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next